Massachusetts, session 194th, H2815.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “prisoners;” in line 275 the following words:--
employees of the department of public health within bargaining unit 8.
of 1